District of Columbia statutes.
19-603.04

Origination of registration in beneficiary form.

A security, whether evidenced by certificate or account, is registered in beneficiary form when the registration includes a designation of a beneficiary to take the ownership at the death of the owner or the deaths of all multiple owners.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 304 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).

Editor's Notes